California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(a) Any white seabass fishery management plan adopted by the commission on or before January 1, 1999, shall remain in effect until amended pursuant to this part.

Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7073, any white seabass fishery management plan adopted by the commission and in existence on January 1, 1999, shall be amended to comply with this part on or before January 1, 2002.

(b) In the case of any fishery for which the commission has management authority, including white seabass, regulations that the commission adopts to implement a fishery management plan or plan amendment for that fishery may make inoperative, in regard to that fishery, any fishery management statute that applies to that fishery, including, but not limited to, statutes that govern allowable catch, restricted access programs, permit fees, and time, area, and methods of taking.

(c) On and after January 1, 2000, the commission may adopt regulations as it determines necessary, based on the advice and recommendations of the department, and in a process consistent with Section 7059, to regulate all emerging fisheries, consistent with Section 7090, all fisheries for nearshore fish stocks, and all fisheries for white seabass. Regulations adopted by the commission may include, but need not be limited to, establishing time and area closures, requiring submittal of landing and permit information, regulating fishing gear, permit fees, and establishing restricted access fisheries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 559, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7072.

(a) Fishery management plans shall form the primary basis for managing California’s sport and commercial marine fisheries.

(b) Fishery management plans shall be based on the best scientific information that is available, on other relevant information that the department possesses, or on the scientific information or other relevant information that can be obtained without substantially delaying the preparation of the plan.

(c) To the extent that conservation and management measures in a fishery management plan either increase or restrict the overall harvest or catch in a fishery, fishery management plans shall allocate those increases or restrictions fairly among recreational and commercial sectors participating in the fishery.

(d) Consistent with Article 17 (commencing with Section 8585), the commission shall adopt a fishery management plan for the nearshore fishery on or before January 1, 2002, if funds are appropriated for that purpose in the annual Budget Act or pursuant to any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 559, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7073.

(a) On or before September 1, 2001, the department shall submit to the commission for its approval a master plan that specifies the process and the resources needed to prepare, adopt, and implement fishery management plans for sport and commercial marine fisheries managed by the state. Consistent with Section 7059, the master plan shall be prepared with the advice, assistance, and involvement of participants in the various fisheries and their representatives, marine conservationists, marine scientists, and other interested persons.

(b) The master plan shall include all of the following:

(1) A list identifying the fisheries managed by the state, with individual fisheries assigned to fishery management plans as determined by the department according to conservation and management needs and consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 7056.

(2) A priority list for preparation of fishery management plans. Highest priority shall be given to fisheries that the department determines have the greatest need for changes in conservation and management measures in order to comply with the policies and requirements set forth in this part. Fisheries for which the department determines that current management complies with the policies and requirements of this part shall be given the lowest priority.

(3) A description of the research, monitoring, and data collection activities that the department conducts for marine fisheries and of any additional activities that might be needed for the department to acquire essential fishery information, with emphasis on the higher priority fisheries identified pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) A process consistent with Section 7059 that ensures the opportunity for meaningful involvement in the development of fishery management plans and research plans by fishery participants and their representatives, marine scientists, and other interested parties.

(5) A process for periodic review and amendment of the master plan.

(c) The commission shall adopt or reject the master plan or master plan amendment, in whole or in part, after a public hearing. If the commission rejects a part of the master plan or master plan amendment, the commission shall return that part to the department for revision and resubmission pursuant to the revision and resubmission procedures for fishery management plans as described in subdivision (a) of Section 7075.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7074.

(a) The department shall prepare interim fishery research protocols for at least the three highest priority fisheries identified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7073. An interim fishery protocol shall be used by the department until a fishery management plan is implemented for that fishery.

(b) Consistent with Section 7059, each protocol shall be prepared with the advice, assistance, and involvement of participants in the various fisheries and their representatives, marine conservationists, marine scientists, and other interested persons.

(c) Interim protocols shall be submitted to peer review as described in Section 7062 unless the department, pursuant to subdivision (d), determines that peer review of the interim protocol is not justified. For the purpose of peer review, interim protocols may be combined in the following circumstances:

(1) For related fisheries.

(2) For two or more interim protocols that the commission determines will require the same peer review expertise.

(d) The commission, with the advice of the department, shall adopt criteria to be applied in determining whether an interim protocol may be exempted from peer review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Fishery Management Plan Preparation, Approval, and Regulations [7075. - 7078.]

7075.

(a) The department shall prepare fishery management plans and plan amendments, including any proposed regulations necessary to implement plans or plan amendments, to be submitted to the commission for adoption or rejection. Prior to submitting a plan or plan amendment, including any proposed regulations necessary for implementation, to the commission, the department shall submit the plan to peer review pursuant to Section 7062, unless the department determines that peer review of the plan or plan amendment may be exempted pursuant to subdivision (c). If the department makes that determination, it shall submit its reasons for that determination to the commission with the plan. If the commission rejects a plan or plan amendment, including proposed regulations necessary for implementation, the commission shall return the plan or plan amendment to the department for revision and resubmission together with a written statement of reasons for the rejection. The department shall revise and resubmit the plan or plan amendment to the commission within 90 days of the rejection. The revised plan or plan amendment shall be subject to the review and adoption requirements of this chapter.

(b) The department may contract with qualified individuals or organizations to assist in the preparation of fishery management plans or plan amendments.

(c) The commission, with the advice of the department and consistent with Section 7059, shall adopt criteria to be applied in determining whether a plan or plan amendment may be exempted from peer review.

(d) Fishery participants and their representatives, fishery scientists, or other interested parties may propose plan provisions or plan amendments to the department or commission. The commission shall review any proposal submitted to the commission and may recommend to the department that the department develop a fishery management plan or plan amendment to incorporate the proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.

(a) To the extent practicable, and consistent with Section 7059, the department shall seek advice and assistance in developing a fishery management plan from participants in the affected fishery, marine scientists, and other interested parties. The department shall also seek the advice and assistance of other persons or entities that it deems appropriate, which may include, but is not limited to, Sea Grant, the National Marine Fisheries Service, the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission, the Pacific Fishery Management Council, and any advisory committee of the department.

(b) In the case of a fishery management plan or a plan amendment that is submitted to peer review, the department shall provide the peer review panel with any written comments on the plan or plan amendment that the department has received from fishery participants and other interested parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7077.

A fishery management plan or plan amendment, or proposed regulations necessary for implementation of a plan or plan amendment, developed by the department shall be available to the public for review at least 30 days prior to a hearing on the management plan or plan amendment by the commission. Persons requesting to be notified of the availability of the plan shall be notified in sufficient time to allow them to review and submit comments at or prior to a hearing. Proposed plans and plan amendments and hearing schedules and agendas shall be posted on the department’s Internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7078.

(a) The commission shall hold at least two public hearings on a fishery management plan or plan amendment prior to the commission’s adoption or rejection of the plan.

(b) The plan or plan amendment shall be heard not later than 60 days following receipt of the plan or plan amendment by the commission. The commission may adopt the plan or plan amendment at the second public hearing, at the commission’s meeting following the second public hearing, or at any duly noticed subsequent meeting, subject to subdivision (c).

(c) When scheduling the location of a hearing or meeting relating to a fishery management plan or plan amendment, the commission shall consider factors, including, among other factors, the area of the state, if any, where participants in the fishery are concentrated.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 7550.5 of the Government Code, prior to the adoption of a fishery management plan or plan amendment that would make inoperative a statute, the commission shall provide a copy of the plan or plan amendment to the Legislature for review by the Joint Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture or, if there is no such committee, to the appropriate policy committee in each house of the Legislature.

(e) The commission shall adopt any regulations necessary to implement a fishery plan or plan amendment no more than 60 days following adoption of the plan or plan amendment. All implementing regulations adopted under this subdivision shall be adopted as a regulation pursuant to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The commission’s adoption of regulations to implement a fishery management plan or plan amendment shall not trigger an additional review process under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(f) Regulations adopted by the commission to implement a plan or plan amendment shall specify any statute or regulation of the commission that is to become inoperative as to the particular fishery. The list shall designate each statute or regulation by individual section number, rather than by reference to articles or chapters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Contents of Fishery Management Plans [7080. - 7088.]

7080.

Consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 7072, each fishery management plan prepared by the department shall summarize readily available information about the fishery including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The species of fish and their location, number of vessels and participants involved, fishing effort, historical landings in the sport and commercial sectors, and a history of conservation and management measures affecting the fishery.

(b) The natural history and population dynamics of the target species and the effects of changing oceanic conditions on the target species.

(c)The habitat for the fishery and known threats to the habitat.

(d) The ecosystem role of the target species and the relationship of the fishery to the ecosystem role of the target species.

(e) Economic and social factors related to the fishery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7081.

Consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 7072, each fishery management plan or plan amendment prepared by the department shall include a fishery research protocol that does all of the following:

(a) Describe past and ongoing monitoring of the fishery.

(b) Identify essential fishery information for the fishery, including, but not limited to, age and growth, minimum size at maturity, spawning season, age structure of the population, and, if essential fishery information is lacking, identify the additional information needed and the resources and time necessary to acquire the information.

(c) Indicate the steps the department shall take to monitor the fishery and to obtain essential fishery information, including the data collection and research methodologies, on an ongoing basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7082.

Each fishery management plan or plan amendment prepared by the department shall contain the measures necessary and appropriate for the conservation and management of the fishery according to the policies and other requirements in this part. The measures may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Limitations on the fishery based on area, time, amount of catch, species, size, sex, type or amount of gear, or other factors.

(b) Creation or modification of a restricted access fishery that contributes to a more orderly and sustainable fishery.

(c) A procedure to establish and to periodically review and revise a catch quota in any fishery for which there is a catch quota.

(d) Requirement for a personal, gear, or vessel permit and reasonable fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7083.

(a) Each fishery management plan prepared by the department shall incorporate the existing conservation and management measures provided in this code that are determined by the department to result in a sustainable fishery.

(b) If additional conservation and management measures are included in the plan, the department shall, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 7072, summarize anticipated effects of those measures on relevant fish populations and habitats, on fishery participants, and on coastal communities and businesses that rely on the fishery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7084.

(a) Consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 7072, each fishery management plan or plan amendment prepared by the department for a fishery that the department has determined has adverse effects on marine fishery habitat shall include measures that, to the extent practicable, minimize adverse effects on habitat caused by fishing.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to activities regulated by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6650) of Part 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.

Consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 7072, each fishery management plan or plan amendment prepared by the department, in fisheries in which bycatch occurs, shall include all of the following:

(a) Information on the amount and type of bycatch.

(b) Analysis of the amount and type of bycatch based on the following criteria:

(1) Legality of the bycatch under any relevant law.

(2) Degree of threat to the sustainability of the bycatch species.

(3) Impacts on fisheries that target the bycatch species.

(4) Ecosystem impacts.

(c) In the case of unacceptable amounts or types of bycatch, conservation and management measures that, in the following priority, do the following:

(1) Minimize bycatch.

(2) Minimize mortality of discards that cannot be avoided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7086.

(a) Consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 7072, each fishery management plan or plan amendment prepared by the department shall specify criteria for identifying when the fishery is overfished.

(b) In the case of a fishery management plan for a fishery that has been determined to be overfished or in which overfishing is occurring, the fishery management plan shall contain measures to prevent, end, or otherwise appropriately address overfishing and to rebuild the fishery.

(c) Any fishery management plan, plan amendment, or regulation prepared pursuant to subdivision (b), shall do both of the following:

(1) Specify a time period for preventing or ending or otherwise appropriately addressing overfishing and rebuilding the fishery that shall be as short as possible, and shall not exceed 10 years except in cases where the biology of the population of fish or other environmental conditions dictate otherwise.

(2) Allocate both overfishing restrictions and recovery benefits fairly and equitably among sectors of the fishery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7087.

(a) Each fishery management plan prepared by the department shall include a procedure for review and amendment of the plan, as necessary.

(b) Each fishery management plan or plan amendment prepared by the department shall specify the types of regulations that the department may adopt without a plan amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7088.

Each fishery management plan and plan amendment shall include a list of any statutes and regulations that shall become inoperative, as to the particular fishery covered by the fishery management plan or plan amendment, upon the commission’s adoption of implementing regulations for that fishery management plan or plan amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Emerging Fisheries [7090. - 7090.]

7090.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a proactive approach to management of emerging fisheries will foster a healthy marine environment and will benefit both commercial and sport fisheries and other marine-dependent activities. Therefore, the commission, based upon the advice and recommendations of the department, shall encourage, manage, and regulate emerging fisheries consistent with the policies of this part.

(b) For purposes of this section, “emerging fishery,” in regard to a marine fishery, means both of the following:

(1) A fishery that the director has determined is an emerging fishery, based on criteria that are approved by the commission and are related to a trend of increased landings or
 participants in the fishery and the degree of existing regulation of the fishery.

(2) A fishery that is not an established fishery. “Established fishery,” in regard to a marine fishery, means, prior to January 1, 1999, one or more of the following:

(A) A restricted access fishery has been established in this code or in regulations adopted by the commission.

(B) A fishery, for which a federal fishery management plan exists, and in which the catch is limited within a designated time period.

(C) A fishery for which a population estimate and catch quota is established annually.

(D) A fishery for which regulations for the fishery are considered at least biennially by the commission.

(E) A fishery for which this code or regulations adopted by the commission prescribes at least two management measures developed for the purpose of sustaining the fishery. Management measures include minimum or maximum size limits, seasons, time, gear, area restriction, and prohibition on sale or possession of fish.

(c) The department shall closely monitor landings and other factors it deems relevant in each emerging fishery and shall notify the commission of the existence of an emerging fishery.

(d) The commission, upon the recommendation of the department, may do either, or both, of the following:

(1) Adopt regulations that limit taking in the fishery by means that may include, but not be limited to, restricting landings, time, area, gear, or access.
 These regulations may remain in effect until a fishery management plan is adopted.

(2) Direct the department to prepare a fishery management plan for the fishery and regulations necessary to implement the plan.

(e) A fishery management plan for an emerging fishery shall comply with the requirements for preparing and adopting fishery management plans contained in this part. In addition to those requirements, to allow for adequate evaluation of the fishery and the acquisition of essential fishery information, the fishery management plan shall provide an evaluation period, which shall not exceed three years unless extended by the commission. During the evaluation period, the plan shall do both of the following:

(1) In order to prevent excess fishing effort during the evaluation period, limit taking in the fishery by
 means that may include, but need not be limited to, restricting landings, time, area, gear, or access to a level that the department determines is necessary for evaluation of the fishery.

(2) Contain a research plan that includes objectives for evaluating the fishery, a description of the methods and data collection techniques for evaluating the fishery, and a timetable for completing the evaluation.

(f) The commission is authorized to impose a fee on an emerging fishery in order to pay the costs of implementing this chapter. The fees may include, but need not be limited to, ocean fishing stamps and permit fees. The fees may not be levied in excess of the necessary costs to implement and administer this chapter. The commission may reduce fees annually if it determines that sufficient revenues exist to cover costs incurred by the department in administering this chapter. The
 commission and the department, with the advice of fishery participants and other interested parties, shall consider alternative ways to fund the evaluation of emerging fisheries.

(g) An emerging fishery is subject to this section unless the department incorporates the fishery into a fishery management plan developed under Sections 7070 to 7088, inclusive.

(h) In the event that this section is found to conflict with Section 1022, this section shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 127.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. SPORT FISHING [7100. - 7400.]



  CHAPTER 1. Generally [7100. - 7232.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application of Part [7100. - 7100.]

7100.

The provisions of this part apply to the taking and possession of fish for any purpose other than commercial.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Sport Fishing Regulations [7110. - 7115.]

7110.

(a) The commission may establish by regulation an automatic process to conform its sport fishing regulations to federal regulations.

(b) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to conforming actions implemented pursuant to the automatic process specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall provide public notice of a conforming action implemented pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 24.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7115.

(a) The department shall identify property it owns or manages that includes areas for sport fishing accessible to persons with disabilities.

(b) Commencing with the booklet of sport fishing regulations published by the commission in 1986, the availability of sport fishing areas, identified by the department as accessible to persons with disabilities under subdivision (a), shall be noted in the booklet of regulations, together with telephone numbers and instructions for obtaining a list of those areas from regional department offices.

(c) Commencing with the booklet of sport fishing regulations published in
 1987, the booklet shall also contain any human health advisories relating to fish that are formally issued by the State Department of Public Health, or summaries of those human health advisories. The summaries shall be prepared in consultation with the State Department of Public Health.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 24.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [7120. - 7123.]

7120.

It is unlawful for any person to possess more than one daily bag limit of any fish, amphibian, or reptile taken under a license issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 7145) unless authorized by regulations adopted by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 128.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.

Except as otherwise provided by this code or by regulation, it is unlawful to sell or purchase any fish or amphibia taken in, or brought into, the waters of the state, or brought ashore at any point in the state.

It is unlawful to buy, sell, or possess in any place of business where fish are bought, sold, or processed, any fish or amphibia taken on any boat, barge, or vessel which carries sport fishermen, except those fish may be possessed in such a place only for the purposes of canning or smoking under regulations adopted by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7123.

The department shall develop a voluntary participation program for the use of departmental observers on board vessels to monitor the taking of marlin by sportfishermen. The department shall, in accordance with Section 1012, procure insurance against the liability of the owners or operators of vessels boarded by observers in the event of injury to or death of any such observer in the course and scope of employment as an observer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 886, Sec. 3.   Effective September 14, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sport Fishing Licenses [7145. - 7155.]

7145.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, every person 16 years of age or older who takes any fish, reptile, or amphibian for any purpose other than profit shall first obtain a valid license for that purpose and shall have that license on his or her person or in his or her immediate possession or where otherwise specifically required by law or regulation to be kept when engaged in carrying out any activity authorized by the license. In the case of a person diving from a boat, the license may be kept in the boat, or in the case of a person diving from the shore, the license may be kept within 500 yards of the shore.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to an owner of privately owned real property, or the owner’s invitee, who, without providing compensation, takes fish for purposes other than profit from a lake or pond that is wholly enclosed by that owner’s real property and that is located offstream and does not at any time derive water from, or supply water to, any permanent or intermittent artificial or natural lake, pond, stream, wash, canal, river, creek, waterway, aqueduct, or similar water conveyance system of the state. Access and control of the real property shall be under the direct authority of the owner and not that of another person or entity.

(2) This subdivision does not, and shall not be construed to, authorize the introduction, migration, stocking, or transfer of aquatic species, prohibited species, or any other nonnative or exotic species into state waters or waterways. This subdivision does not supersede or otherwise affect any provision of law that governs aquaculture, including, but not limited to, the operation of trout farms, or any activity that is an adjunct to or a feature of, or that is operated in conjunction with, any other enterprise operated for a fee, including, but not limited to, private parks or private recreation areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 109.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7147.

The owner or operator of a boat or vessel licensed pursuant to Section 7920 shall not permit any person to fish from that boat or vessel unless that person has, in his or her possession, a valid California sport fishing license and any required stamp, report card, or validation issued pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7149.05.

(a) A sport fishing license granting the privilege to take any fish, reptile, or amphibian anywhere in this state for purposes other than profit shall be issued to any of the following:

(1) (A) A resident, 16 years of age or older, for the period of a calendar year, or, if issued after the beginning of the year, for the remainder of the year, upon payment of a base fee of thirty-one dollars and twenty-five cents ($31.25).

(B) The director may authorize the issuance of a license under subparagraph (A) that is valid for the period of 12 consecutive months beginning on the date specified on the license instead of only for the calendar year.

(2) (A) A nonresident, 16 years of age or older, for the period of a calendar year, or, if issued after the beginning of the year, for the remainder of the year, upon payment of a base fee of eighty-four dollars ($84).

(B) The director may authorize the issuance of a license under subparagraph (A) that is valid for the period of 12 consecutive months beginning on the date specified on the license instead of only for the calendar year.

(3) A nonresident, 16 years of age or older, for a period of 10 designated consecutive days beginning on the date specified on the license, upon payment of the fee set forth in paragraph (1). Notwithstanding Section 1053.1, more than one 10-day license for different 10-day periods may be issued to, or possessed by, a person at one time.

(4) A resident or nonresident, 16 years of age or older, for two designated consecutive days, upon payment of one-half the fee set forth in paragraph (1). Notwithstanding Section 1053.1, more than one two-day license for different two-day periods may be issued to, or possessed by, a person at one time.

(5) A resident or nonresident, 16 years of age or older, for one designated day, upon payment of a base fee of ten dollars ($10). Notwithstanding Section 1053.1, more than one one-day license for different days may be issued to, or possessed by, a person at one time.

(b) California sport fishing license validations shall be issued by authorized license agents in the same manner as sport fishing licenses, and no compensation shall be paid to the authorized license agent for issuing the validations except as provided in
 Section 1055.1.

(c) This section applies only to licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements issued through the Automated License Data System.

(d) The base fees specified in this section are applicable to the 2004 license year, and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(e) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivision (d), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(f) (1) The director shall provide the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2025, recommendations for increasing fees for all sport fishing licenses to levels that provide
 adequate resources to fund sport fishing, including all necessary supporting activities, at the department.

(2) The director shall submit to the Legislature, on or before July 1, 2028, a written report evaluating all sport fishing licenses issued pursuant to this section, including sales information, the cost of administering and implementing sport fishing licenses to the department and commission, and evidence of any changes in the number of new or renewing sport fishing license participants. The director shall collect all relevant, appropriate, and sufficient data necessary to evaluate sport fishing licenses issued pursuant to this section and to justify the amount of the license fees assessed pursuant to this section, including information about data collection and enforcement costs. Data collection efforts pursuant to this paragraph shall avoid duplication and use data collected for other purposes, to the extent feasible.

(3) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(4) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 607, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 129.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 130 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

7149.05.

(a) A sport fishing license granting the privilege to take any fish, reptile, or amphibian anywhere in this state for purposes other than profit shall be issued to any of the following:

(1) A resident, 16 years of age or older, for the period of a calendar year, or, if issued after the beginning of the year, for the remainder of the year, upon payment of a base fee of thirty-one dollars and twenty-five cents ($31.25).

(2) A nonresident, 16 years of age or older, for the period of a calendar year, or, if issued after the beginning of the year, for the remainder of the year, upon payment of a base fee of eighty-four dollars ($84).

(3) A
 nonresident, 16 years of age or older, for a period of 10 designated consecutive days beginning on the date specified on the license, upon payment of the fee set forth in paragraph (1). Notwithstanding Section 1053.1, more than one 10-day license for different 10-day periods may be issued to, or possessed by, a person at one time.

(4) A resident or nonresident, 16 years of age or older, for two designated consecutive days, upon payment of one-half the fee set forth in paragraph (1). Notwithstanding Section 1053.1, more than one two-day license for different two-day periods may be issued to, or possessed by, a person at one time.

(5) A resident or nonresident, 16 years of age or older, for one designated day, upon payment of a base fee of ten dollars ($10). Notwithstanding Section 1053.1, more than one one-day license for different days may be issued to, or possessed by, a person
 at one time.

(b) California sport fishing license validations shall be issued by authorized license agents in the same manner as sport fishing licenses, and no compensation shall be paid to the authorized license agent for issuing the validations except as provided in Section 1055.1.

(c) This section applies only to licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements issued through the Automated License Data System.

(d) The base fees specified in this section are applicable to the 2004 license year, and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(e) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivision (d), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation
 costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 607, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 130.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7149.2.

(a) In addition to Section 7149.05, the department shall issue a lifetime sport fishing license under this section. A lifetime sport fishing license authorizes the taking of fish, amphibians, or reptiles anywhere in this state in accordance with the law for purposes other than profit for the life of the person to whom issued unless revoked for a violation of this code or regulations adopted under this code. A lifetime sport fishing license is valid for a one-year period from January 1 through December 31 and may be renewed annually, regardless of any lapse of the license, at no additional cost to the licensee. A lifetime sport fishing license is not transferable. A lifetime sport fishing license does not include any special tags, stamps, or fees.

(b) A lifetime
 sport fishing license may be issued to residents of this state, as follows:

(1) To a person 62 years of age or over, upon payment of a base fee of three hundred sixty-five dollars ($365).

(2) To a person 40 years of age or over and less than 62 years of age, upon payment of a base fee of five hundred forty dollars ($540).

(3) To a person 10 years of age or over and less than 40 years of age upon payment of a base fee of six hundred dollars ($600).

(4) To a person less than 10 years of age upon payment of a base fee of three hundred sixty-five dollars ($365).

(c) Nothing in this section requires a person less than 16 years of age to obtain a license to take fish, amphibians, or reptiles for
 purposes other than profit.

(d) Nothing in this section exempts a license applicant from meeting other qualifications or requirements otherwise established by law for the privilege of sport fishing.
